Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 18 Rhode Island Public Transit Authority
39-18-8.
Trust agreement — Other security for bonds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any transit property or any part thereof. The trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without limitation, covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state that may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Any trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any trust agreement or resolution may contain other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the authority’s cost of operation and maintenance. Bonds may also be secured by insurance or by letters of credit, or in any other manner deemed appropriate by the authority not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, or may be unsecured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

39-18-9.
Revenues.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to fix and revise, from time to time, such schedules of service and rates of fare and charges for service furnished or operated as it determines to be reasonable. The schedules of service, rates of fare, and charges for service shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state; except as provided in §

39-18-4

. Provided, however, any changes in frequency of services of more than fifteen percent (15%), providers of service, rates of service, other than systemwide changes, and charges for service shall be presented for comment in at least one public hearing scheduled in an accessible location in each county affected, and the hearing shall be scheduled in two (2) sessions, one during daytime business hours and one during evening hours. The revenues derived from the authority’s operations and any other funds or property received or to be received by the authority (including, without limitation, any funds or other property received or to be received by the authority pursuant to §

39-18-4(a)(10)

), in whole or in part, at any time and from time to time, may be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on some or all of the authority’s bonds as provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, funds, or other property so pledged, and thereafter received by the authority, shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind, in tort, contract, or otherwise, against the authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 7; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 517, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 21; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 10.

39-18-10.
Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority may, in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues to be received to a trustee, which shall be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, which shall act as trustee of the bonds and hold and apply the bonds to the purposes of this chapter, subject to this chapter and to regulations as the resolution or trust agreement may provide, or may provide for the funds to be held in a separate account of the authority maintained at any bank within or without the state to be disbursed therefrom on the instructions of such officer or officers of the authority as may be so authorized and empowered by resolution of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

39-18-11.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, or any of the coupons pertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement related thereto, except to the extent the rights given in this chapter may be restricted by the trust agreement, may, by civil action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted in this chapter or under the trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing and revising of schedules and rates of fare and charges for service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 120.

39-18-12.
Exemptions from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state and for the increase of their commerce, maintenance, and increase of their transportation and general prosperity and for the improvement of their health, welfare, and living conditions and as the acquisition, operation, and maintenance by the authority of the transit properties acquired will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon the facilities or upon any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of this chapter, or upon the income from the operation of the transit facilities. The bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer, and income derived therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof) at all times shall be free from taxation within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 8; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

39-18-13.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are hereby made securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1.

39-18-14.
Negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, all bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1.

39-18-15.
Refunding bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds of the authority, including temporary notes, then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds.

The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds may, in the discretion of the authority, be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of the outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof, and may, pending application, be placed in escrow to be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be determined by the authority.

Any escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested and reinvested in direct obligations of the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by direct obligations of the United States of America, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to ensure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on any investment may also be applied to payment of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner.

All bonds shall be issued and secured and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 127, § 9; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1.

39-18-16.
Limitation of powers.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with any person, firm, corporation, or federal agency subscribing to or acquiring the bonds to be issued by the authority that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority until all bonds at any time issued, together with the interest thereon, are fully met and discharged. The state does further pledge to and agree with the United States and any other federal agency, that in the event that any federal agency shall contribute any funds for the acquisition and improvement of any transit property or for the authority’s operations or otherwise, the state will not alter or limit the rights and powers of the authority in any manner that would be inconsistent with the due performance of any agreements between the authority and the federal agency; and the authority shall continue to have and may exercise all powers granted in this chapter, so long as the powers shall be necessary or desirable for the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 120.

39-18-17.
Labor relations with employees of acquired transit facilities.

Whenever the authority acquires transit property facilities under the provisions of this chapter, the authority shall continue the payment of all pensions and retirement allowances under and in accordance with the pension plan in effect at the time of the acquisition.

As of the date of the acquisition of the transit property under the provisions of this chapter, such officers and employees, as may be determined by the authority to be qualified and necessary for the carrying on of the transit operations, shall be transferred to, and become officers and employees of, the authority, it being the intention hereof that transit property facilities acquired by the authority shall at all times be operated under personnel qualified to supervise mass transit facilities. No officer or employee so transferred and becoming an officer or employee of the authority in accordance with this section shall, by reason of the transfer, without his or her consent be removed, lowered in rank or compensation, or suspended except for just cause and for reasons specifically given to him or her in writing within twenty-four (24) hours after the removal, suspension, or transfer or lowering in rank or compensation; nor shall any officer or employee by reason of transfer, without his or her consent, be in any worse position in respect to workers’ compensation, pension, superannuation, sickness, or other benefits or other allowances granted by his or her previous employer to him or her, the widowed person, family, or personal representatives than he or she enjoyed under any person, firm, or corporation under whom he or she held his or her employment immediately prior to his or her transfer to the employment of the authority; provided, however, that the authority may abolish any office or post of any existing executive officer if in the opinion of the authority the office or post is an unreasonable addition to the staff of the authority. The authority shall have the authority to bargain collectively with labor organizations representing employees of the authority and to enter into agreements with the organizations relative to wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, health benefits, pensions, and retirement allowances of the employees.

In case of any labor dispute where collective bargaining does not result in agreement, the authority shall offer to submit the dispute to arbitration by a board composed of three (3) persons, one appointed by the authority, one appointed by the labor organization representing the employees, and a third member to be agreed upon by the labor organization and the authority. The member selected by the labor organization and the authority shall act as chairperson of the board. The determination of the majority of the board of arbitration thus established shall be final and binding on all matters in dispute. If, after a period of ten (10) days from the date of the appointment of the two (2) arbitrators representing the authority and the labor organization, the third arbitrator has not been selected, then either arbitrator may request the American arbitration association to furnish a list of five (5) persons from which the third arbitrator shall be selected. The arbitrators appointed by the authority and the labor organization promptly after the receipt of the list, shall determine by lot the order of elimination, and, thereafter, each shall in that order alternately eliminate one name until only one name remains. The remaining person on the list shall be the third arbitrator. The term “labor dispute” shall be broadly construed and shall include any controversy concerning wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, or benefits, including health and welfare, sick leave, insurance, or pension or retirement provisions, but not limited thereto, and including any controversy concerning any differences or questions that may arise between the parties, including, but not limited to, the making or maintaining of collective bargaining agreements, the terms to be included in the agreements and the interpretation or application of the collective bargaining agreements and any grievances that may arise. Each party shall pay one-half (1/2) of the expenses of the arbitration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1.

39-18-18.
Action by resolution — Reports — Audits.

Any action taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the authority shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, permits considered and their disposition, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, polices and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative, or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the authority; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year, and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

The director of administration shall cause an annual audit of the books, records, and accounts of the authority to be made and the costs thereof shall be treated as part of the cost of operation of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 103, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 144, § 5.

39-18-18.1.
Authority deemed instrumentality and political subdivision of state.

For the purposes of chapters 42 — 44 of title 28 and chapters 29 — 37 of title 28, and with respect to chapter 31 of title 9, and notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of these chapters, the authority shall be deemed to be an instrumentality and a political subdivision of the state; provided, however, with respect to chapters 29 — 37 of title 28, the authority shall pay all benefits, required by law, until the authority ceases to exist. Thereafter, the payments shall be the obligation of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 19, § 2.

39-18-19.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 210, § 1.

39-18-20.
Use of services of department of transportation.

The authority shall use the services of the department of transportation in planning, designing, and constructing transportation services or facilities to the extent that these services are provided by the department of transportation. The authority may use any other services provided by the department of transportation. Nothing in this section shall modify any trust agreement entered into by the Rhode Island public transit authority in accordance with §

39-18-8

, as amended prior to July 1, 1970.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 6.

39-18-21.
Agreements and certifications regarding state and federal funds.

The authority and the department of transportation shall be authorized and empowered to enter into agreements, between each other and with others, providing for the assignment to the authority of all or part of any grants, loan, or other money or property of whatever nature received, or to be received, by the department; and the department of transportation is hereby authorized and empowered to certify to the authority, or to others, the amount of funds or property from any federal agency or other source received, or to be received, or reasonably expected to be received, or applied for, which funds or property have been or will be or are expected to be assigned to the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 157, § 2.

39-18-22.
State appropriations.

The general assembly shall appropriate annually a sum for the financial support of the operating expenses of the Rhode Island public transit authority from certain proceeds of the motor fuel tax reserved for this purpose pursuant to §

31-36-20

. The total amount of state subsidy disbursements in any fiscal year shall not exceed the appropriation for that year. In the event that dedicated motor fuel tax revenues received during a fiscal year are not sufficient to support the appropriation for that year, the difference shall be transferred from the proceeds of the motor fuel tax imposed by chapter 36 of title 31. Funds appropriated to the authority pursuant to this section shall be administered by the department of transportation in accordance with procedures established jointly by the departments of transportation and administration. The authority shall annually submit to the department of transportation a comprehensive budget request for funds for the ensuing fiscal year. Prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, the authority shall enter into an agreement with the departments of administration and transportation establishing the conditions for payment of the available state and federal subsidies. The director of administration is authorized, from time to time, to advance funds from the general fund to the Rhode Island public transit authority to be used for the purpose of this section, in anticipation of transfers from the revenues reserved pursuant to §

31-36-20

, provided that the aggregate of all advances less transfers, at any one time, shall not exceed the total amount of the annual appropriation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 3, § 1.

39-18-23.
Medical care available to employees.

All eligible employees of the Rhode Island public transit authority shall be entitled to purchase benefits set forth in §

36-12-2

at the same rate as the group rate paid by the state for the benefits.

Payments for benefits shall be made by the authority directly to the general treasurer at the rate as calculated by the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 19, § 1.

39-18-24.
John J. MacDonald, Jr. Transportation Initiative.

The Rhode Island public transit authority is authorized and directed, in consultation with the division of public utilities and carriers and the governor’s commission on disabilities, to develop the “John J. MacDonald, Jr. Transportation Initiative” for a statewide federally funded “New Freedom Program” to reduce barriers to transportation services and expand the transportation mobility options available to people with disabilities who need wheelchair-accessible transportation beyond the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) of 1990, by September 30, 2010. The goal is to provide on-demand wheelchair-accessible taxicab service throughout the state, and especially at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport and the train stations.

The administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers is authorized and directed to issue a regional wheelchair taxicab certificate after a hearing, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, the administrative procedures act, to any qualified applicant therefore, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to properly perform the service proposed and to conform to the provisions of chapter 14 of this title, and the requirements, orders, rules, and regulations of the administrator thereunder, and that the proposed service, to the extent to be authorized by the certificate, is or will be required by the present or future public convenience and necessity; otherwise the application shall be denied.

The Rhode Island public transit authority is authorized and directed:

To adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of the John J. MacDonald, Jr. transportation initiative; and

Purchase up to two (2) wheelchair-accessible taxicabs for each regional wheelchair taxicab or public motor vehicle certificate holder, utilizing New Freedom — Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users (23 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.) funds for eighty percent (80%) of the cost. The program or purchases thereunder shall be funded by federal grants and private funds only and shall not have a negative financial impact on the Rhode Island public transit authority’s operating budget. The operators of the wheelchair-accessible taxicabs shall be responsible for the twenty percent (20%) nonfederal match for purchase of the vehicles.

The operators of the certified wheelchair-accessible taxicabs or public motor vehicles, and not the Rhode Island public transit authority, shall be responsible for all operating and maintenance costs of the wheelchair-accessible taxicabs or public motor vehicles.

The Rhode Island public transit authority and the division of public utilities and carriers is authorized and directed to begin implementation of the “John J. MacDonald, Jr. Transportation Initiative” on or before January 1, 2011.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 9, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 9, effective June 1, 2021.